Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 3
Guardians of Incapacitated Persons

§ 15-5-301. Testamentary appointment of guardian for incapacitated person or developmentally disabled person.

The parent of an incapacitated person or developmentally disabled person may by will appoint a guardian of the incapacitated person or developmentally disabled person. A testamentary appointment by a parent becomes effective when, after having given seven (7) days’ prior written notice of his intention to do so to the incapacitated person or developmentally disabled person and to the person having his care or to his nearest adult relative, the guardian files acceptance of appointment in the court in which the will is informally or formally probated, if prior thereto, both parents are dead or the surviving parent is adjudged incapacitated. If both parents are dead, an effective appointment by the parent who died later has priority unless it is terminated by the denial of probate in formal proceedings.

The spouse of a married incapacitated person or developmentally disabled person may by will appoint a guardian of the incapacitated person or developmentally disabled person. The appointment becomes effective when, after having given seven (7) days’ prior written notice of his intention to do so to the incapacitated person or developmentally disabled person and to the person having his care or to his nearest adult relative, the guardian files acceptance of appointment in the court in which the will is informally or formally probated. An effective appointment by a spouse has priority over an appointment by a parent unless it is terminated by the denial of probate in formal proceedings.

This state shall recognize a testamentary appointment effected by filing acceptance under a will probated at the testator’s domicile in another state.

On the filing with the court in which the will was probated of written objection to the appointment by the person for whom a testamentary appointment of guardian has been made, the appointment is terminated. An objection does not prevent appointment by the court in a proper proceeding of the testamentary nominee or any other suitable person upon an adjudication of incapacity in proceedings under the succeeding sections of this part.

If the appointment by will is for a developmentally disabled person and there is an existing guardianship proceeding under chapter 4, title 66, Idaho Code, in which the decedent was the sole guardian, the guardian appointed by will must also give seven (7) days’ written notice of his intention to file an acceptance of appointment to any then serving guardian ad litem for the developmentally disabled person in such proceeding and to the department of health and welfare for the region in which the proceeding was brought.
(f) If the appointment by will is for an incapacitated person for whom there is an existing guardianship proceeding in which the decedent was the sole guardian, the guardian appointed by will must also give seven (7) days’ written notice of his intention to file an acceptance of appointment to any then serving guardian ad litem for the incapacitated person in such proceeding.

§ 15-5-302. Venue.

The venue for guardianship proceedings for an incapacitated person is in the place where the incapacitated person resides or is present. If the incapacitated person is admitted to an institution pursuant to order of a court of competent jurisdiction, venue is also in the county in which that court sits.

§ 15-5-303. Procedure for court appointment of a guardian of an incapacitated person.

The incapacitated person or any person interested in his welfare may petition for a finding of incapacity and appointment of a guardian or co-guardians, limited or general. It is desirable to make available the least restrictive form of guardianship to assist persons who are only partially incapable of caring for their own needs. Recognizing that every individual has unique needs and differing abilities, the public welfare should be promoted by establishing a guardianship that permits incapacitated persons to participate as fully as possible in all decisions affecting them; that assists such persons in meeting the essential requirements for their physical health and safety, in protecting their rights, in managing their financial resources, and in developing or regaining their abilities to the maximum extent possible; and that accomplishes these objectives through providing, in each case, the form of guardianship that least interferes with legal capacity of a person to act in his own behalf. The petition shall include a plan in reasonable detail for the proposed actions of the guardian regarding the affairs of the ward after appointment of the guardian, to the extent reasonably known to the petitioner at the time of filing of the petition. If the complete mental, physical and emotional status, and the health care needs and other needs of the ward are not reasonably known to the petitioner at the time the petition is filed, or if the petitioner is not the proposed guardian, then the guardian shall submit to the court, and to all interested persons, in writing, within thirty (30) days after appointment of the guardian, a reasonably detailed plan covering such matters. Such plan must also be given to any person who has filed a request for notice under section 15-5-406, Idaho Code, and to other persons as the court may direct. Such plan shall be given to all such persons in accordance with the methods set forth in section 15-1-401, Idaho Code. If the plan changes during any time period between the periodic reports of the guardian, the modified plan shall be filed with the next report as a part thereof.

Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall set a date for hearing on the issues of incapacity and unless the allegedly incapacitated person has counsel of his own choice, it shall appoint an attorney to represent him in the proceeding, who shall have the powers and duties of a guardian ad litem. The person alleged to be incapacitated shall be examined by a physician or other qualified person appointed by the court who shall submit his report in writing to the court. The court may, in appropriate cases, appoint a mental health professional, defined as a psychiatrist, psychologist, gerontologist, licensed social worker, or licensed counselor, to examine the proposed ward and submit a written report to the court. The person alleged to be incapacitated also shall be interviewed by a visitor sent by the court. The visitor shall also interview the person who appears to have caused the petition to be filed and any person who is nominated to serve as guardian, and visit the present place of abode of the person alleged to be incapacitated and the place it is proposed that he will be detained or reside if the requested appointment is made and submit his report in writing to the court. Where possible without undue delay and expenses beyond the ability to pay of the allegedly incapacitated person, the court, in formulating the judgment, may utilize the service of any public or charitable agency that offers or is willing to evaluate the condition of the allegedly incapacitated person and make recommendations to the court regarding the most appropriate form of state intervention in his affairs.
(c) Unless excused by the court for good cause, the proposed guardian shall attend the hearing. The person alleged to be incapacitated is entitled to be present at the hearing in person, and to see or hear all evidence bearing upon his condition. He is entitled to be represented by counsel, to present evidence and subpoena witnesses and documents, to examine witnesses, including the court-appointed physician, mental health professional, or other person qualified to evaluate the alleged impairment, as well as the court-appointed visitor, and otherwise participate in the hearing. The hearing may be a closed hearing upon the request of the person alleged to be incapacitated or his counsel and a showing of good cause. After appointment, the guardian shall immediately provide written notice of any proposed change in the permanent address of the ward to the court and all interested parties.

§ 15-5-304. Findings — Order of appointment.

The court shall exercise the authority conferred in this part so as to encourage the development of maximum self-reliance and independence of the incapacitated person and make appointive and other orders only to the extent necessitated by the incapacitated person’s actual mental and adaptive limitations or other conditions warranting the procedure.

The court may appoint a guardian as requested if it is satisfied that the person for whom a guardian is sought is incapacitated and that the appointment is necessary or desirable as a means of providing continuing care and supervision of the incapacitated person. The court, on appropriate findings, may:

Treat the petition as one for a protective order under section 15-5-401, Idaho Code, and proceed accordingly;

Enter any other appropriate order; or

Dismiss the proceedings.

As an alternative to appointing one (1) guardian for an incapacitated person, the court may appoint no more than two (2) persons as co-guardians for the incapacitated person if the court finds:
(c)(1) As an alternative to appointing one (1) guardian for an incapacitated person, the court may appoint no more than two (2) persons as co-guardians for the incapacitated person if the court finds:

The appointment of co-guardians will best serve the interests of the incapacitated person; and

The persons to be appointed as co-guardians will work together cooperatively to serve the best interests of the incapacitated person.

The parents of an incapacitated person shall have preference over all other persons for appointment as co-guardians, unless the court finds that the parents are unwilling to serve as co-guardians, or are not capable of adequately serving the best interests of the incapacitated person.

If the court appoints co-guardians, the court shall also determine whether the guardians:

May act independently;

May act independently but must act jointly in specified matters; or

Must act jointly.

The court may, at the time of appointment or later, on its own motion or on appropriate petition or motion of the incapacitated person or other interested person, limit the powers of a guardian otherwise conferred by this section and thereby create a limited guardianship. Any limitations on the statutory power of a guardian of an incapacitated person shall be endorsed on the guardian’s letters, or in the case of a guardian by testamentary appointment, shall be reflected in letters that shall be issued at the time any limitation is imposed. Following the same procedure, a limitation may be removed and appropriate letters issued.

This determination by the court must be stated in the order of appointment and in the letters of guardianship.

§ 15-5-305. Acceptance of appointment — Consent to jurisdiction.

By accepting appointment, a guardian submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding relating to the guardianship that may be instituted by any interested person. Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the guardian or mailed to him by ordinary mail at his address as listed in the court records and to his address as then known to the petitioner.

§ 15-5-306. Termination of guardianship for incapacitated person.

Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the authority and responsibility of a guardian for an incapacitated person terminates upon the death of the guardian or ward, the determination of incapacity of the guardian, or upon removal or resignation as provided in section 15-5-307[, Idaho Code,] of this part. Testamentary appointment under an informally probated will terminates if the will is later denied probate in a formal proceeding. Termination does not affect his liability for prior acts nor his obligation to account for funds and assets of his ward.

If the conditions set forth in section 54-1142(1)(j)[, Idaho Code,] exist, then the guardianship shall continue as set forth in that section.

§ 15-5-307. Removal or resignation of guardian — Termination of incapacity.

On petition of the ward or any person interested in his welfare, the court may remove a guardian and appoint a successor if in the best interests of the ward. On petition of the guardian, the court may accept his resignation and make any other order which may be appropriate.

An order adjudicating incapacity may specify a minimum period, not exceeding one (1) year, during which no petition for an adjudication that the ward is no longer incapacitated may be filed without special leave. Subject to this restriction, the ward or any person interested in his welfare may petition for an order that he is no longer incapacitated, and for removal or resignation of the guardian. A request for this order may be made by informal letter to the court or judge and any person who knowingly interferes with transmission of this kind of request to the court or judge may be adjudged guilty of contempt of court.

Before removing a guardian, accepting the resignation of a guardian, or ordering that a ward’s incapacity has terminated, the court, following the same procedures to safeguard the rights of the ward as apply to a petition for appointment of a guardian, may send a visitor to the residence of the present guardian, and to the place where the ward resides or is detained, to observe conditions and report in writing to the court.

Upon request, a jury may be summoned to hear factual issues as in other civil cases.

§ 15-5-308. Visitor in guardianship proceeding.

A visitor is, with respect to guardianship proceedings, an individual with no personal interest in the proceedings and who meets the qualifications identified in Idaho supreme court rule. A visitor may either be an employee of or appointed by the court. If appointed, a visitor becomes an officer of the court.

A visitor must report to the court on the status of the person proposed to be under guardianship. All reports must be under oath or affirmation and must comply with Idaho supreme court rules.

A visitor shall be personally immune from any liability for acts, omissions or errors in the same manner as if such visitor were a volunteer or director under the provisions of section 6-1605, Idaho Code.

A visitor cannot serve as guardian ad litem. The visitor and the guardian ad litem for the person proposed to be under guardianship may not be members or employees of the same entity.

The visitor may request to order a criminal history and background check at the proposed guardian’s expense on any individual who resides in or may frequent the residence of the person proposed to be under guardianship. Any such check shall be conducted pursuant to section 56-1004A(2) and (3), Idaho Code.

§ 15-5-309. Notices in guardianship proceedings.

In a proceeding for the appointment or removal of a guardian of an incapacitated person and, if notice is required in a proceeding for appointment of a temporary guardian, notice of hearing shall be given to each of the following:

The ward or the person alleged to be incapacitated and his spouse, or, if none, his adult children or if none, his parents;

Any person who is serving as his guardian, conservator or who has his care and custody;

In case no other person is notified under subsection (1)(a) of this section, at least one (1) of his closest adult relatives, if any can be found; and

Any person who has filed a request for notice under this section.

Notice shall be served personally on the alleged incapacitated person. In all other cases, required notices shall be given as provided in section 15-1-401, Idaho Code. Waiver of notice by the person alleged to be incapacitated is not effective unless he attends the hearing or his waiver of notice is confirmed by the visitor or the guardian ad litem. Representation of the alleged incapacitated person by a guardian ad litem is not necessary.

Any person desiring notice of any order or filing in a proceeding involving an alleged incapacitated person in whom he is interested may file a request for notice with the court stating his name, the name of the incapacitated person, the nature of the requesting person’s interest, and address or that of his attorney. Upon payment of any fee required by statute or court rule, the clerk shall mail a copy of the request to the guardian if one has been appointed or to the petitioner if there is no guardian. A request is effective only as to matters occurring after its filing.

§ 15-5-310. Temporary guardians of incapacitated persons.

The court may appoint a temporary guardian if it finds:

A petition for guardianship under section 15-5-303, Idaho Code, has been filed, but a guardian has not yet been appointed;

Substantial evidence of incapacity;

By a preponderance of the evidence an emergency exists that will likely result in immediate and substantial harm to the person’s health, safety or welfare; and

No other person appears to have the ability, authority and willingness to act.

When a person is under guardianship, the court may appoint a temporary guardian if it finds:

Substantial evidence that the guardian is not performing the guardian’s duties; and

By a preponderance of the evidence, an emergency exists that will likely result in immediate and substantial harm to the person’s health, safety or welfare.

A temporary guardian may be appointed without notice or hearing if the court finds from a statement under oath that the person will be immediately and substantially harmed before notice can be given or a hearing held.
(c)(1) A temporary guardian may be appointed without notice or hearing if the court finds from a statement under oath that the person will be immediately and substantially harmed before notice can be given or a hearing held.

If the court appoints a temporary guardian without notice, notice of the appointment must be given to those designated in section 15-5-309, Idaho Code, within seventy-two (72) hours after the appointment. The notice must inform the interested persons of the right to request a hearing. The court must hold a hearing on the appropriateness of the appointment within fourteen (14) days after the request by an interested person.

The temporary guardian’s authority may not exceed ninety (90) days, unless extended for good cause. The powers of the temporary guardian must be limited to those necessary to protect the immediate health, safety or welfare of the person until such time as a hearing may be held in the matter.

A temporary guardian must make reports as the court requires.

The authority of a guardian previously appointed by the court is suspended as long as a temporary guardian has authority. The court must hold a hearing before the expiration of the temporary guardian’s authority and may enter any appropriate order.

§ 15-5-311. Who may be guardian — Priorities.

Any competent person, except as set forth hereafter, or a suitable institution may be appointed guardian of an incapacitated person.

The person preferred by the incapacitated person shall be appointed guardian unless good cause be shown why appointment of such person is contrary to the best interests of the incapacitated person. If the incapacitated person is unable to express a preference, any previous expression, including a durable power of attorney for health care, may be considered by the court.

Persons who are not disqualified have priority for appointment as guardian in the following order:

The person preferred by the incapacitated person. The court shall always consider the wishes expressed by an incapacitated person as to who shall be appointed guardian;

The person(s) nominated as health care agent in a durable power of attorney for health care by the incapacitated person, in the order of priority set forth in such power;

The spouse of the incapacitated person;

An adult child of the incapacitated person;

A parent of the incapacitated person, including a person nominated by will or other writing signed by a deceased parent;

Any relative of the incapacitated person with whom he has resided for more than six (6) months prior to the filing of the petition;

A person nominated by the person who is caring for him or paying benefits to him.

No convicted felon, or person whose residence is the incapacitated person’s proposed residence or will be frequented by the incapacitated person and is frequented by a convicted felon, shall be appointed as a guardian of an incapacitated person unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that such appointment is in the best interests of the incapacitated person.

No individual shall be appointed as guardian of an incapacitated person unless all of the following first occurs:

The proposed guardian has submitted to and paid for a criminal history and background check conducted pursuant to section 56-1004A(2) and (3), Idaho Code;

Pursuant to an order of the court so requiring, any individual who resides in the incapacitated person’s proposed residence has submitted, at the proposed guardian’s expense, to a criminal history and background check conducted pursuant to section 56-1004A(2) and (3), Idaho Code;

The findings of such criminal history and background checks have been made available to the visitor and guardian ad litem by the department of health and welfare; and

The proposed guardian provided a report of his or her civil judgments and bankruptcies to the visitor, the guardian ad litem and all others entitled to notice of the guardianship proceeding pursuant to section 15-5-309, Idaho Code.

The provisions of paragraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (5) of this section shall not apply to an institution nor to a legal or commercial entity.

§ 15-5-312. General powers and duties of guardian.

A guardian of an incapacitated person has the powers and responsibilities of a parent who has not been deprived of custody of his unemancipated minor child except that a guardian is not legally obligated to provide from his own funds for the ward and is not liable to third persons for acts of the ward, and except as hereinafter limited. In particular, and without qualifying the foregoing, a guardian has the following powers and duties, except as modified by order of the court when the guardianship is limited:

To the extent that it is consistent with the terms of any order by a court of competent jurisdiction relating to detention or commitment of the ward, he is entitled to custody of the person of his ward and may establish the ward’s place of abode within or without this state. The guardian shall take reasonable measures to ensure that a convicted felon does not reside with, care for or visit the ward without court approval.

If entitled to custody of his ward he shall make provision for the care, comfort and maintenance of his ward, and, whenever appropriate, arrange for his training and education. Without regard to custodial rights of the ward’s person, he shall take reasonable care of his ward’s clothing, furniture, vehicles and other personal effects and commence protective proceedings if other property of his ward is in need of protection.

A guardian may give any consents or approvals that may be necessary to enable the ward to receive medical or other professional care, counsel, treatment or service. A guardian shall be automatically entitled to any information governed by the health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 (HIPAA), 42 U.S.C. 1320d and 45 CFR 160 through 164, and the appointment of such guardian shall be deemed to grant such release authority.

If no conservator for the estate of the ward has been appointed, the guardian may institute proceedings to appoint a conservator. In no circumstances shall the guardian exercise any of the powers of a conservator.

A guardian shall be required to report to the court at least annually on the status of the ward. All reports shall be under oath or affirmation and shall comply with Idaho supreme court rules.

If a conservator has been appointed, all of the ward’s estate received by the guardian in excess of those funds expended to meet current expenses for support, care, and education of the ward must be paid to the conservator for management as provided pursuant to this chapter, and the guardian must account to the conservator for funds expended.

Any guardian of one for whom a conservator also has been appointed shall control the custody and care of the ward and is entitled to receive reasonable sums for his services and for room and board furnished to the ward as agreed upon between him and the conservator, provided the amounts agreed upon are reasonable under the circumstances. The guardian may request the conservator to expend the ward’s estate by payment to third persons or institutions for the ward’s care and maintenance.

A guardian may delegate certain of his responsibilities for decisions affecting the ward’s well-being to the ward when reasonable under all of the circumstances.

§ 15-5-313. Proceedings subsequent to appointment — Venue.

The court where the ward resides has concurrent jurisdiction with the court which appointed the guardian, or in which acceptance of a testamentary appointment was filed, over resignation, removal, accounting and other proceedings relating to the guardianship, including proceedings to limit the authority previously conferred on a guardian, or to remove limitations previously imposed.

If the court located where the ward resides is not the court in which acceptance of appointment is filed, the court in which proceedings subsequent to appointment are commenced shall in all appropriate cases notify the other court, if in this state, and after consultation with that court determine whether to retain jurisdiction or transfer the proceedings to the other court, whichever may be in the best interest of the ward. A copy of any order accepting a resignation, altering his authority or removing a guardian shall be sent to the court in which acceptance of appointment is filed. If the court in which acceptance of appointment is filed is in another state, the court in this state shall proceed in accordance with chapters 9, 10 and/or 11, title 15, Idaho Code, as appropriate.

§ 15-5-314. Compensation and expenses.

If not otherwise compensated for services rendered or expenses incurred, any visitor, guardian ad litem, physician, guardian, or temporary guardian appointed in a protective proceeding is entitled to reasonable compensation from the estate for services rendered and expenses incurred in such status, including for services rendered and expenses incurred prior to the actual appointment of said guardian or temporary guardian which were reasonably related to the proceedings. If any person brings or defends any guardianship proceeding in good faith, whether successful or not, he or she is entitled to receive from the estate his or her necessary expenses and disbursements including reasonable attorney’s fees incurred in such proceeding. If the estate is inadequate to bear any of the reasonable compensation, fees, and/or costs referenced in this section, the court may apportion the reasonable compensation, fees, and/or costs to any party, or among the parties, as the court deems reasonable.

If court visitor services are provided by court personnel, any moneys recovered shall be collected through the clerk of the district court of the county in which the appointment was made and the clerk shall pay the moneys to the state treasurer for deposit in the guardianship and conservatorship project fund established by section 31-3201G, Idaho Code.

§ 15-5-315. Guardian ad litem — Duties.

Subject to the direction of the court, the guardian ad litem shall have the following duties, which shall continue until the resignation of the guardian ad litem or until the court removes the guardian ad litem or no longer has jurisdiction, whichever occurs first:

To conduct an independent factual investigation of the circumstances of the ward including, without limitation, the circumstances described in the petition;

To file with the court a written report stating the results of the investigation, the guardian ad litem’s recommendations, and such other information as the court may require. The guardian ad litem’s written report shall be delivered to the court, with copies to all parties to the case, at least five (5) days before the date set for the adjudicatory hearing;

To act as an advocate for the ward for whom appointed at each stage of the proceedings under this chapter and to be charged with the general representation of the ward. To that end, the guardian ad litem shall participate fully in the proceedings to the degree necessary to adequately represent the ward, and shall be entitled to confer with the ward and the ward’s immediate family including, but not limited to, spouse, parents, siblings, children and next of kin;

To facilitate and negotiate to ensure that the court, the department of health and welfare, if applicable, and the ward’s attorney, if any, each fulfill their obligations to the ward in a timely fashion;

To monitor the circumstances of a ward, if the ward is found to be within the purview of this chapter, to assure compliance with the law, and to assure that the terms of the court’s orders are being fulfilled and remain in the best interest of the ward;

To meet any parent or other person having legal or physical custody of the ward, record the concerns of the parent, and report them to the court or, if no such meeting occurs, file an affidavit stating why no meeting occurred;

To maintain all information regarding the case confidential and to not disclose such information except to the court or to other parties to the case;

To determine whether existing powers, trusts, and other measures may adequately give the ward the legal protection otherwise provided by a guardian, or whether such powers, trusts or other measures could be reasonably created and, if so, to recommend that either no guardianship be granted or that only a suitably limited guardianship be granted; and

To exercise such other and further duties as may be expressly imposed by court order.

§ 15-5-316. Guardian ad litem — Rights and powers.

The guardian ad litem has the following rights and powers to fulfill the duties set forth in section 15-5-315, Idaho Code, which shall continue until the resignation of the guardian ad litem or until the court removes the guardian ad litem or no longer has jurisdiction, whichever occurs first.

The guardian ad litem shall have the right and power to file pleadings, motions, memoranda and briefs on behalf of the ward, and to have all of the rights of the ward, whether conferred by statute, rule of court, or otherwise.

All parties to any proceeding under this chapter shall promptly notify the guardian ad litem, and the guardian’s attorney, if any, of all hearings, staff hearings or meetings, investigations, depositions, and significant changes of circumstances of the ward.

Except to the extent prohibited or regulated by federal law, upon presentation of a copy of the order appointing the guardian ad litem, any person or agency including, without limitation, any hospital, school organization, department of health and welfare, doctor, nurse or other health care provider, psychologist, psychiatrist, police department, or mental health clinic, shall permit the guardian ad litem to inspect and copy pertinent records relating to the ward necessary for the proceeding for which the guardian ad litem has been appointed.

The guardian ad litem may request, and the court may order whether in response to such request or otherwise, a criminal history and background check to be conducted at the proposed guardian’s expense on any individual who resides in the ward’s proposed residence. Any such check shall be conducted pursuant to section 56-1004A(2) and (3), Idaho Code.

§ 15-5-317. [Reserved.]

A guardianship terminates upon the death of the ward or upon order of the court.

On petition of a ward, a guardian, or another person interested in the ward’s welfare, the court may terminate a guardianship if the ward no longer needs the assistance or protection of a guardian. The court may modify the type of appointment or powers granted to the guardian if the extent of protection or assistance previously granted is currently excessive or insufficient or the ward’s capacity to provide for support, care, education, health, and welfare has so changed as to warrant that action.

Except as otherwise ordered by the court for good cause, the court, before terminating a guardianship, shall follow the same procedures to safeguard the rights of the ward as apply to a petition for guardianship. Upon presentation by the petitioner of evidence establishing a prima facie case for termination, the court shall order the termination unless it is proven that continuation of the guardianship is in the best interest of the ward.

§ 15-5-318. Termination or modification of guardianship.